Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 2. Travel Regulations.

Sec. 39.20.110.
Per diem allowance.

Officials and employees of the state agencies, while traveling on official business and away from their designated post of duty, shall be allowed, instead of their actual expenses for subsistence and all fees or tips, a per diem allowance to be prescribed by the commissioner of administration under the regulatory authority set out in AS

39.20.160

, and in consultation with the head of the agency concerned.

History.

(§ 4 ch 60 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 99 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 105 SLA 1970; am § 10 ch 47 SLA 1974)

Sec. 39.20.120.
Allowable expenses.

Except as provided in AS

39.20.110

—

39.20.170

, only actual and necessary traveling expenses shall be allowed to an official or employee.

History.

(§ 5 ch 60 SLA 1957)

Sec. 39.20.130.
Mileage allowance.

Officials and employees of state agencies shall, under regulations adopted by the commissioner of administration, and whenever the mode of transportation is authorized or approved as more advantageous to the state, be paid an amount, instead of actual expenses of transportation, not to exceed a mileage allowance set by the commissioner of administration for the use of privately-owned automobiles or airplanes, when engaged in official travel inside or outside their designated posts of duty or places of service. In addition to the mileage allowance, there may be allowed reimbursement for the actual cost of ferry fares, and bridge, road, and tunnel tolls.
When two or more officials or employees are traveling in the same direction, and it is possible to share a privately-owned automobile or airplane, the mileage permitted shall be allowed only once.

History.

(§ 6 ch 60 SLA 1957; am § 11 ch 47 SLA 1974)

Sec. 39.20.140.
Travel costs and travel outside the state.

The Department of Administration may not pay an official or employee for per diem or transportation costs unless the travel is clearly necessary to benefit the state.

The Department of Administration may not reimburse an official or employee or pay for more than the lowest tourist class fare for the most direct route unless

tourist class accommodation is not available;

waiting for tourist class accommodation would occasion a delay harmful to the state; or

the Department of Administration finds that travel by tourist class accommodation is not in the best interest of the state, and authorizes other accommodation.

When the Department of Administration authorizes more expensive travel under (b)(3) of this section, it shall file a justification for that authorization with the travel voucher. When fares other than tourist class are authorized under (b) of this section, the Department of Administration may not reimburse the official or employee or pay for more than the lowest first class fare available.

Officials and employees are authorized to travel only the least number of days necessary to transact the business involved, to secure return passage, and to return.

Every official and employee shall, unless otherwise authorized by law to travel outside the state, obtain prior approval for travel outside the state from the head of the official’s or employee’s department or from an immediate supervisor, or from the Department of Administration if the official or employee is not within a department or is not under the direct supervision of an official or supervisor. If an employee deviates materially from the travel authorized under this section, the employee must obtain approval for the deviation from the person who approved the travel before the Department of Administration may reimburse the employee for the travel.

History.

(§ 7 ch 60 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 1962)

Sec. 39.20.150.
Advances and recovery.

An agency may advance, through proper disbursing methods, to a person entitled to per diem or mileage allowance under AS

39.20.110

—

39.20.170

the sums considered advisable considering the character and probable duration of the travel to be performed.

Sums advanced and not used for allowable travel expense are recoverable by setoff against salary due, or otherwise, from the person to whom advanced, or the person’s estate, by deduction from any amount due from the state, or by other legal methods of recovery that may be necessary.

History.

(§ 8 ch 60 SLA 1957)

Sec. 39.20.160.
Regulations.

The fixing and payment under AS

39.20.110

—

39.20.170

of travel and per diem allowances and of advances and recovery and reimbursement of travel expenses shall be in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner of administration.
The regulations shall be uniform for all officials and employees, and all agencies and departments. The regulations shall also govern the use of public transportation facilities by officials and employees. The regulations relate to the internal management of state agencies and their adoption is not subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 9 ch 60 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 13 SLA 1963)

Cross references. —

For legislative per diem, see AS

24.10.130

.

Sec. 39.20.170.
Construction of AS 39.20.110 — 39.20.170.

AS

39.20.110

—

39.20.170

may not be construed to modify or repeal a law providing for the travel expenses of the governor, or members of the legislature, or members of boards or commissions of the state government.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 1957)

Sec. 39.20.180.
Transportation and per diem expenses for members of boards, commissions, etc.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the provisions in this section relating to per diem and transportation govern exclusively with respect to a member of a state board, commission, committee, judicial council, or other similar body of persons of the state organized or established under the authority of law, but excluding any other state employee other than a legislator, who is otherwise entitled by law to receive from the state payments for expenses of transportation, and for reimbursement or for per diem in lieu of reimbursement for other expenses incident to duties as such member:

for transportation, the member is entitled either to the use of state transportation requests, or to be reimbursed for expenses of transportation to the same extent, in the same manner, and under the same conditions as provided for state officials and employees by the provisions of AS

39.20.110

—

39.20.170

;

for reimbursement for other expenses, the member is entitled to a per diem allowance prescribed by the commissioner of administration under the regulatory authority set out in AS

39.20.160

for each day or portion of a day spent in actual meeting or on authorized official business incident to duties as a member.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1953; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1962; am § 5 ch 136 SLA 1967; am § 12 ch 47 SLA 1974; am § 31 ch 85 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For coverage of state board and commission members under the Worker’s Compensation Act, see AS

23.30.242

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Alaska Power Authority may reimburse a member only for (1) time spent actually meeting or (2) time spent on authorized official business incident to his duties as a member. April 19, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

To recover an allowance for nonmeeting activity, an occupational licensing board member must be engaged in an activity within the scope of the applicable board’s powers. November 6, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

An occupational licensing board member cannot receive a per diem allowance for conducting an activity that should be performed by division personnel; any activity approved must be specifically defined by statute as a board duty and should be an activity that cannot be accomplished within the confines of a board meeting. If the task can be performed during a meeting, then per diem should not be paid for time unnecessarily spent by a board member outside a board meeting. It is important, of course, for budgetary reasons, that board activity for which per diem compensation is sought be kept to a minimum. November 6, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 39.20.185.
Per diem prohibited in community of residence.

A state official or employee who is a member of the judicial council or a state official or employee appointed by the governor to a state board, commission, or committee established under the authority of law is not entitled to per diem when the meeting or other business takes place in the community of which the member is a resident.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1968)

Sec. 39.20.190.
Definitions.

In AS

39.20.110

—

39.20.190

,

“employee” or “state employee” means a person employed by a state agency;

“official” or “state official” means the appointive head of a state agency;

“official travel” means travel inside or outside the state on official business of the state, for which payment or reimbursement is expected or authorized;

“per diem allowance” means a daily flat rate of payment instead of actual expenses;

“state agency,” “agency,” or “department” means department, office, institution, board, commission, bureau, division, or other administrative unit forming the state government;

“subsistence” means lodging, meals, and other necessary expenses incidental to the personal sustenance or comfort of the traveler;

“traveler” means the official or employee engaged in official travel for the state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 60 SLA 1957; am § 12 ch 168 SLA 1990)